New Jersey, session 222, S3389.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 5 of P.L.1999, c.90 (C.2C:33-27) is amended to read as follows: 5.    Consumption of alcohol in restaurants. a.     [No] A person who owns or operates a restaurant, dining room or other public place where food or liquid refreshments are sold or served to the general public, and for which premises a license or permit authorizing the sale of alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption has not been issued shall not: (1)   [Shall] allow the consumption of alcoholic beverages, other than wine [or], a malt alcoholic beverage, cider, or mead, in a portion of the premises which is open to the public; or (2)   [Shall charge any admission fee or cover, corkage, or service charge or advertise inside or outside of such premises that patrons may bring and consume their own wine or malt alcoholic beverages in a portion of the premises which is open to the public.] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.     , c.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) (3)   [Shall] allow the consumption of wine [or] , malt alcoholic beverages , cider, or mead at times or by persons to whom the service or consumption [or] of alcoholic beverages on the licensed premises is prohibited by State or municipal law or regulation. b.    [Nothing in this act] (1) This act shall not restrict the right of  a municipality or an owner or operator of a restaurant, dining room, or other public place where food or liquid refreshments are sold or served to the general public from prohibiting the consumption of alcoholic beverages on those premises. (2)   The owner or operator of a restaurant for which a license or permit authorizing the sale of alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption has not been issued shall be entitled to: (a)   charge an admission fee or cover, corkage, or service charge for patrons who bring and consume their own malt alcoholic beverages, wine, cider, or mead on the restaurant premises; and (b)   advertise inside or outside of the restaurant premises that patrons may bring and consume their own wine, malt alcoholic beverages, cider, or mead in a portion of the premises which is open to the public. c.     A person who violates any provision of this act is a disorderly person, and the court, in addition to the sentence imposed for the disorderly person violation, may by its judgment bar the owner or operator from allowing consumption of wine or malt alcoholic beverages in his premises as authorized by this act. (cf: P.L.1999, c.90, s.5) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.